Utah statutes.
49-12-408.   Minimum monthly allowance.
(1) A retiree under this system may not receive less than $9 per month for
each year of service credit at the time of retirement.
(2)  The increased allowance provided by this section may not exceed the
allowance payable under Option One under Section 49-12-402, by more than 75%.
(3)  The cost of providing this benefit shall be assumed within the
contribution rate established under Section 49-12-301.
